Tennessee, session 114, HB2159.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-31-205, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(c) A garagekeeper may store a motor vehicle without express written
authorization for storage pursuant to subsection (a) if the garagekeeper makes a good
faith attempt to acquire consent to repair in the manner provided in § 66-19-104(a)(2),
and the garagekeeper sends notice of the intent to store by certified mail, return receipt
requested, to the last known registered owner of the motor vehicle.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 66-19-103, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(f)
(1) A garagekeeper's failure to obtain express written authorization to
store a motor vehicle under § 55-31-205(a) does not abrogate the
garagekeeper's right to a lien under this section if the garagekeeper makes the
good faith attempt to acquire consent and provides notice to the owner under §
55-31-205(c).
(2) A garagekeeper may enforce a lien under this section after the
expiration of thirty (30) days from the date of mailing of the notice unless a return
receipt from the owner is received by the garagekeeper within the thirty-day
HB2159
011576
- 1 -

period, and in such case, the lien may be enforced after the expiration of thirty
(30) days from the date of receipt of the notice shown on the return receipt.
(3) To establish compliance with § 55-31-205(c), the garagekeeper shall
submit to the department of revenue:
(A) A written record of the name of the person whom the
garagekeeper attempted to notify, the date and time of the attempt, and
the signature of the person who made the attempted notification; and
(B) A copy of the receipt issued by the post office with which the
letter is certified, showing the name of the sender of the letter and the
name and address of the person to whom the letter is addressed, and a
copy of the return receipt, if received.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-31-207, is amended by deleting
subsection (f) and substituting:
(f)
(1) Except as provided in subdivision (f)(2), subsections (a) and (d) do
not apply to a motor vehicle that was towed or stored by a garagekeeper for the
purpose of repairing the motor vehicle if the garagekeeper first obtained the
authorization of the owner for the repairs and the owner of the motor vehicle has
been notified that the repairs have been completed.
(2) Subsections (a), (d), and (e) do not apply to a motor vehicle that was
stored by a garagekeeper for the purpose of repairing the motor vehicle if, in the
case of a garagekeeper who cannot obtain the authorization of the owner for the
repairs, the garagekeeper complies with the good faith attempt to acquire
consent and notice requirements of § 55-31-205(c).
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011576